apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="tim/ere__vblex" c="p.40">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>o</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>es</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>et</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emus</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>edes</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ent</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ia</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ias</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iat</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iamus</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iais</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iant</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ais</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eres</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eret</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eremus</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ereis</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>erent</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ais</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>idu</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ida</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idos</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idas</l><r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fin/ire__vblex" c="p.41">
      <e>       <p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>o</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>it</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imus</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ides</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>int</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ia</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ias</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iat</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iamus</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iais</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aiant</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ais</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ires</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iret</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iremus</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ireis</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irent</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ide</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>idu</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ida</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idos</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idas</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bòlere" r="LR"><p><l>bol</l><r>bòl</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mòvere"><i>mòv</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="includere"><i>includ</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="promòvere"><i>promòv</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reconnòschere"><i>reconnòsch</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lèghere"><i>lègh</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lèghere" r="LR"><p><l>legh</l><r>lègh</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="timere"><i>tim</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tradùere"><i>tradù</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="normalizere"><i>normaliz</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="collochere"><i>colloch</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pèrdere"><i>pèrd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ispèrdere"><i>ispèrd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tòddere"><i>tòdd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mòere"><i>mò</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="emergere"><i>emerg</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rìere"><i>rì</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crèere"><i>crè</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bìdere"><i>bìd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bìdere" r="LR"><p><l>bid</l><r>bìd</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provochere"><i>provoch</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iscrìere" r="LR"><p><l>iscri</l><r>iscrì</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="descrìere" r="LR"><p><l>descri</l><r>descrì</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nàschere" r="LR"><p><l>nasch</l><r>nàsch</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="costituiere" r="LR"><p><l>constitui</l><r>costitui</r></p><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bìvere"><i>bìv</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="permìtere"><i>permìt</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumprèndere"><i>cumprènd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dirìgere"><i>dirìg</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="detzìdere"><i>detzìd</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="connòschere"><i>connòsch</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naschire" r="LR"><p><l>nask</l><r>nasch</r></p><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istabilire"><i>istabil</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="essire"><i>ess</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="divenire"><i>diven</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bidire"><i>bid</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="produire"><i>produ</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finire"><i>fin</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="defìnire"><i>defìn</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="defìnire" r="LR"><p><l>defin</l><r>defìn</r></p><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fuire"><i>fu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunduire"><i>cundu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="collire"><i>coll</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istituire"><i>istitu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faddire"><i>fadd</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mutire"><i>mut</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cosire"><i>cos</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trasire"><i>tras</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="serbire"><i>serb</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="costruire"><i>costru</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunstituire"><i>cunstitu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunstituire" r="LR"><p><l>constitu</l><r>cunstitu</r></p><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ischire"><i>isch</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contribuire"><i>contribu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="godire"><i>god</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aderire"><i>ader</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esistire"><i>esist</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="partzire"><i>partz</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proibire" r="LR"><p><l>preub</l><r>proib</r></p><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunsentire"><i>cunsent</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="retzire"><i>retz</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sostituire"><i>sostitu</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="partire"><i>part</i><par n="fin/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="preferare" r="LR"><i>prefer</i><par n="tim/ere__vblex"/></e>
